District of Columbia statutes.
5-133.07

Repealed

Police surgeons.

Repealed.

Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-145, § 302(a), 39 DCR 4895
Merit system, application to police officers and firefighters, see § 1-632.03.
1981 Ed., § 4-120.
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 302(a) of Omnibus Budget Support Temporary Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-134, July 23, 1992, law notification 39 DCR 5815).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 302(a) of the Omnibus Budget Support Emergency Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-203, April 29, 1992, 39 DCR 3219).